District of Columbia statutes.
6-731.02

Exemption by consent of tenants.

Section 6-731.01 shall not apply to any person performing any alteration upon any housing accommodation if the tenants of unvacated rental units, which are the subject of notices to vacate and which can reasonably be expected to be caused by the alteration to come to be in substantial violation (or, if already in substantial violation, to be in greater violation) of the housing regulations of the District of Columbia for a period of time in excess of 24 hours, agree in writing to the alteration after receiving written notice of the alteration and its effect upon the habitability of the affected units.

Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-129, § 3, 23 DCR 9693
This section is referenced in § 6-731.01.
1981 Ed., § 5-526.
1973 Ed., § 5-325.